rules/rm_sursilv.aff
SET UTF-8
LANG rm-sursilv
TRY airentsucldmogphbvfzxqjèéàkòwyüùöêîAIRENTSUCLDMOGPHBVFZXQJÈÉÀKÒWYÜÙÖÊÎ-

FLAG long
NEEDAFFIX XX

AF 33
AF XXFsFp      # staila/1: staila, stailas [po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem]
AF XXMsMp      # caschiel/2: caschiel, caschiels [po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc]
AF XXAd        # abstract/3: abstract, abstracts, abstracta, abstractas [po:ADJ]
AF XXAv        # biaronz/4: biaronz [po:ADV]
AF XXTaTbTyTz  # admirar/5: admir/admirel, admiras, admira, ... (transitive)
AF XXIj        # assa/6: assa [po:INTJ]
AF XXFs        # feglia/7: feglia, *feglias [po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem]
AF XXTaTcTyTz  # skizzar/8: skizzeschel, skizzeschas, ... (transitive)
AF XXTaTdTyTz  # spetgar/9: spetg/spetgel, spetgas, spetga, ... (transitive)
AF XXTaTeTyTz  # cumpignar/10: cumpogn(el), cumpognas, cumpogna, cumpignais, ... (transitive)
AF XXTaTfTyTz  # pagar/11: pag/paghel, pagas, paga, paghein, pagheis, pagan (transitive)
AF XXTaTgTyTz  # tuccar/12: tucc/tuchel, tuccas, tucca, tuchein, tucheis, tuccan (transitive)
AF XXTaThTyTz  # valer/13: val/valel, valas, vala, valein, valeis, valan (transitive)
AF XXTaTiTyTz  # vender/14: vend/vendel, vendas, venda, vendein/vendin, vendeis/vendis, vendan (transitive)
AF XXTaTjTyTz  # partir/15: part/partel, partas, parta, partin, partis, partan (transitive)
AF XXTaTkTyTz  # capir/16: capesch/capeschel, capescha, capescha, capin, capis, capeschan (transitive)
AF XXFP        # repressalias/17: [po:NOUN uf:Gender=Fem|Number=Plur]
AF XXMP        # capuns/18: [po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc|Number=Plur]
AF XXPf        # Catrina/19: [po:PROPN uf:Gender=Fem]
AF XXPm        # Carli/20: [po:PROPN uf:Gender=Masc]
AF XXAp        # sin/21: [po:ADP]
AF XXCj        # u/22: [po:CONJ]
AF XXMs        # biestgam/23: biestgam, *biestgams [po:NOUN uf:Gender=Masc]
AF XXCn        # otg/24: [po:NUM uf:NumType=Card]
AF XXAo        # tschienavel/25: [po:Adj uf:NumType=Ord]
AF XXPd        # quest/26: quest, questa, quests, questas [po:PRON PronType=Dem]
AF XXPi        # tgi/27: [po:PRON PronType=Int]
AF XXAi        # extra/28: extra, extra, extra, extra (invariable adjective)
AF XXPj        # enqualche/29: [po:PRON PronType=Ind]
AF XXTz        # *buer/30 [st:beiber]: buevel, buevas, ...; past tense of irregular verbs
AF XXTx        # *buer/31 [st:beiber]: buius, buida, buis, buidas; part participle of irregular verbs
AF XXPn        # Decurtins/32 [po:PROPN]
AF XXAdc       # admirabel/33: admirabel, admirabels, admirabla, admirablas [po:ADJ]

# Improve suggestions for common spelling mistakes.
# *partescha --> parta
# *parteschel --> partel
# *capa --> capescha
# *capel --> capeschel
REP 4
REP escha a
REP esche e
REP a escha
REP e esche

# Transitive verbs: Forms shared by all verb classes
SFX Ta N 1
SFX Ta 0 0 . po:VERB uf:Subcat=Tran|VerbForm=Inf

# Transitive verbs: admirar
# - Ind Pres: admir/admirel, admiras, admira, admirein, admireis, admiran
SFX Tb N 7
SFX Tb ar 0 . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tb ar el . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tb ar as . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tb ar a . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tb ar ein . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tb ar eis . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tb ar an . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: skizzar
# - Ind Pres: skizz/skizzel, skizzas, skizzescha, skizzein, skizzeis, skizzeschan
SFX Tc N 6
SFX Tc ar eschel . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tc ar eschas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tc ar escha . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tc ar ein . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tc ar eis . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tc ar eschan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: spitgar
# - Ind Pres: spetg/spetgel, spetgas, spetga, spitgein, spitgeis, spetgan
SFX Td N 7
SFX Td itgar etg . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Td itgar etgel . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Td itgar etgas . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Td itgar etga . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Td itgar itgein . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Td itgar itgeis . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Td itgar etgan . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: cumpignar
# - Ind Pres: compogn/cumpognel, cumpognas, cumpogna, cumpignein, cumpigneis, cumpognan
SFX Te N 7
SFX Te ignar ogn . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Te ignar ognel . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Te ignar ognas . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Te ignar ogna . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Te ignar ignein . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Te ignar igneis . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Te ignar ognan . uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: pagar
# - Ind Pres: pag/paghel, pagas, paga, paghein, pagheis, pagan
SFX Tf N 7
SFX Tf ar 0 . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tf ar hel . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tf ar as . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tf ar a . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tf ar hein . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tf ar heis . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tf ar an . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: tuccar
# - Ind Pres: tucc/tuchel, tuccas, tucca, tuchein, tucheis, tuccan
SFX Tg N 7
SFX Tg ccar cc . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tg ccar chel . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tg ccar ccas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tg ccar cca . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tg ccar chein . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tg ccar cheis . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tg ccar ccan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: valer (TODO: Find an example that is actually transitive)
# - Ind Pres: val/valel, valas, vala, valein, valeis, valan
SFX Th N 7
SFX Th er 0 . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Th er el . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Th er as . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Th er a . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Th er ein . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Th er eis . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Th er an . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: vender
# - Ind Pres: vend/vendel, vendas, venda, vendein/vendin, vendeis/vendis, vendan (transitive)
SFX Ti N 9
SFX Ti er 0 . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er el . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er as . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er a . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er ein . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er in . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er eis . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er is . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Ti er an . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: partir (TODO: Find an example that is actually transitive)
# - Ind Pres: part/partel, partas, parta, partin, partis, partan
SFX Tj N 7
SFX Tj ir 0 . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tj ir el . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tj ir as . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tj ir a . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tj ir in . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tj ir is . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tj ir an . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin

# Transitive verbs: capir
#- Ind Pres: capesch/capeschel, capescha, capescha, capin, capis, capeschan
SFX Tk N 7
SFX Tk ir esch . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tk ir eschel . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tk ir eschas . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tk ir escha . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Sing|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tk ir in . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=1|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tk ir is . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=2|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
SFX Tk ir eschan . po:VERB uf:Mood=Ind|Number=Plur|Person=3|Subcat=Tran|Tense=Pres|VerbForm=Fin
